Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB850.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 58 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 3222.2. Hydraulic fracturing fluid tracer.(a) Applicability.--This section shall apply to hydraulic fracturing of unconventional wells performed on or after the effective date of this subsection.(b) Required additives.--A service provider who performs any part of a hydraulic fracturing treatment and a vendor who provides hydraulic fracturing chemicals directly to the operator for a hydraulic fracturing treatment shall include a tracer substance in the base stimulation fluid used in the alteration of an unconventional well.(c) Specifications.--The department shall specify the type 123456789101112131415161718 of tracer substance that the operator is required to use in the alteration of an unconventional well. The following shall apply:(1) The tracer substance must be traceable to a specific operator after the tracer substance is used in the alteration of an unconventional well.(2) The department shall determine that the use of the tracer substance will not endanger public health or the environment.(d) Regulations.--The Environmental Quality Board shall promulgate regulations necessary to meet the requirements of this section.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0850PN0880 - 2 - 123456789101112